District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.20

Authorization to seek delegation.

The Mayor is authorized to take actions necessary to obtain authorization from the United States Environmental Protection Agency for the Mayor to administer and enforce state programs pursuant to the Renovation, Repair and Painting and Pre-Renovation Education programs under Part 745 of Chapter 1 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 20a
as added Mar. 31, 2011, D.C. Law 18-348, § 2(m), 58 DCR 717

History